District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-606

Funds — Acceptance of donations, devises, or bequests for particular purposes.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1281, ch. 854, § 579
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-606.
1981 Ed., § 29-806.
1973 Ed., § 29-406.